Florida, session 2026, SB1574.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as âMattieâs Law.â 19 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 20 383.14, Florida Statutes, is amended, paragraph (c) is added to 21 that subsection, and paragraph (i) is added to subsection (3) of 22 that section, to read: 23 383.14âScreening for metabolic disorders, other hereditary 24 and congenital disorders, and environmental risk factors.â 25 (2)âRULES.â 26 (a)âAfter consultation with the Genetics and Newborn 27 Screening Advisory Council, The department shall adopt and 28 enforce rules requiring that every newborn in this state must 29 shall: 30 1.âBefore becoming 1 week of age, have a blood specimen 31 collected for newborn screenings; 32 2.âBe tested for any condition included on the federal 33 Recommended Uniform Screening Panel which the council advises 34 the department should be included under the stateâs screening 35 program. After the council recommends that a condition be 36 included, the department shall submit a legislative budget 37 request to seek an appropriation to add testing of the condition 38 to the newborn screening program. The department shall expand 39 statewide screening of newborns to include screening for such 40 conditions within 18 months after the council renders such 41 advice, if a test approved by the United States Food and Drug 42 Administration or a test offered by an alternative vendor is 43 available. If such a test is not available within 18 months 44 after the council makes its recommendation, the department must 45 shall implement such screening as soon as a test offered by the 46 United States Food and Drug Administration or by an alternative 47 vendor is available; 48 3.âAt the appropriate age, be tested for such other 49 metabolic diseases and hereditary or congenital disorders as the 50 department may deem necessary; and 51 4.âBeginning January 1, 2027, be screened for biliary 52 atresia by testing the newbornâs direct bilirubin levels using 53 the blood specimen collected for newborn screenings; and 54 5.4.âSubject to legislative appropriation, beginning 55 January 1, 2027, be screened for Duchenne muscular dystrophy. 56 (c)âThe department shall consult with the Genetics and 57 Newborn Screening Advisory Council before adopting rules 58 regarding screening methods, follow-up procedures, and the 59 inclusion of additional conditions in the screening program. 60 (3)âDEPARTMENT OF HEALTH; POWERS AND DUTIES.âThe department 61 shall administer and provide certain services to implement the 62 provisions of this section and shall: 63 (i)âBy October 1, 2026, implement a statewide public health 64 education campaign to increase public awareness and 65 understanding of biliary atresia and its associated risks. The 66 campaign shall, at a minimum: 67 1.âEducate new and expecting parents on the symptoms of 68 biliary atresia and the importance of early diagnosis. 69 2.âProvide guidance to health care providers licensed under 70 chapters 458, 459, and 464 on strategies for identifying biliary 71 atresia in infants and the risks of delayed treatment. 72 73 All provisions of this subsection must be coordinated with the 74 provisions and plans established under this chapter, chapter 75 411, and Pub. L. No. 99-457. 76 Section 3.âSection 395.3043, Florida Statutes, is created 77 to read: 78 395.3043âMandatory newborn screening for biliary atresia.âA 79 hospital that provides birthing services shall screen newborns 80 for biliary atresia as required in s. 383.14(2)(a)4. 81 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.